Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 49-15-46.
Licensing and fees for vessels engaged in catching, taking, carrying or transporting oysters; license requirement for captain of commercial oyster vessel; designation of alternate captain for each license; transfer of vessel license; tagging of oysters harvested; recreational oyster permits; shell retention fees; authority to keep certain number of blue crabs for personal consumption.

Each vessel used to catch, take, carry or transport oysters from the reefs of the State of Mississippi, or engaged in transporting any oysters in any of the waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi, for commercial use, shall annually, before beginning operations, be licensed by the commission and pay the following license fee:

Fifty Dollars ($50.00) on each in-state vessel or boat used for tonging oysters or gathering oysters by hand;

One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) on each in-state vessel or boat used for dredging oysters;

One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) on each out-of-state vessel or boat used for tonging oysters or gathering oysters by hand;

Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) on each out-of-state vessel or boat used for dredging oysters;

Fifty Dollars ($50.00) on each in-state vessel or boat used for off-bottom oyster aquaculture operations; or

One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) on each out-of-state vessel or boat used for off-bottom oyster aquaculture operations.

Each captain of each commercial vessel, used for either tonging, dredging, or off-bottom oyster aquaculture shall purchase a license entitled “captain license - oyster” for a fee not to exceed Ten Dollars ($10.00) and may designate one (1) alternate captain for each license.

The commission may authorize the transfer of a vessel license to a different vessel provided that the owner of both vessels is the same titled owner.

All oysters harvested in the State of Mississippi shall be tagged. Tags shall be issued by the department and shall bear the catcher’s name, the date and origin of the catch, the shell stock dealer’s name and permit number. The department shall number all tags issued and shall maintain a record of those tags. The commission, in its discretion, may adopt any regulations regarding the tagging of oysters and other shellfish.

Each person catching or taking oysters from the waters of the State of Mississippi for personal use shall obtain a permit from the commission and pay an annual recreational oyster permit fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00). Oysters caught under a recreational permit shall not be offered for sale. The limits on the allowable catch of oysters for recreational purposes shall be three (3) sacks per week. The department shall issue tags of a distinguishing color to designate recreationally harvested oysters, which shall be tagged on the same day of harvest in the manner prescribed in subsection (4) of this section for commercially harvested oysters or by regulation of the commission.

The commission shall assess and collect a shell retention fee for the shells taken from waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi as follows:

Commercial and recreational harvesters – Fifteen Cents (15¢) per sack paid to the department on the day of harvest;

Initial oyster processor, dealer or factory first purchasing the oysters - Fifteen Cents (15¢) per sack paid to the department no later than the tenth day of the month following the purchase, on forms submitted by the department;

Commercial harvesters transporting their catch out of the state-Fifty Cents (50¢) per sack paid to the department on the day of harvest, in addition to the fees paid in subsection (6)(a); and

Commercial harvesters not selling their oysters to a Mississippi dealer - Fifteen Cents (15¢) per sack paid to the department on the day of harvest, in addition to fees paid in subsection (6)(a).

Funds received from the shell retention fee shall be paid into a special fund in the State Treasury to be appropriated by the Legislature for use by the commission to further oyster production in this state, which includes plantings of oysters and/or cultch materials.

During open seasons, oysters may be taken only by hands, tongs and dredges.

Vessels licensed under Section 49-15-46 may keep in whole, for personal consumption up to thirty-six (36) blue crabs (portunidae family), per day. This exemption for personal consumption does not apply to fish or crabs that are otherwise illegal to possess or catch.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 8; Laws, 1999, ch. 519, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 524, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2019, ch. 381, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 49-15-47.
Prohibition against discharging human waste in Mississippi’s marine waters from vessels harvesting or transporting oysters; approved marine sanitation devices required; penalties.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to discharge solid or human waste from any vessel while the vessel is used to harvest or transport oysters in the marine waters of the state.

Each vessel used to harvest or transport oysters is required to have an approved functional marine sanitation device (MSD), portable toilet or other sewage disposal receptacle designed to contain human sewage.The approved marine sanitation device (MSD), portable toilet or other sewage disposal receptacle shall:

Be used only for the purpose intended.

Be secured while on board and located to prevent contamination of shell stock by spillage or leakage.

Be emptied only into an approved sewage disposal system.

Be cleaned before being returned to the vessel.

Not be cleaned with equipment used for washing or processing food.

The use of other receptacles for sewage disposal may be approved by the department if the receptacles are:

Constructed of impervious, cleanable materials and have tight-fitting lids; and

Meet the requirements listed in subsection (2).

The commission shall promulgate administrative penalties for violations of this section, which may include, but not be limited to, revocation of the license of the oyster vessel for up to one (1) year for the first offense, revocation up to two (2) years for the second offense, and permanent revocation for the third offense.

Upon issuance of a citation for a violation of this section, the vessel shall be removed from the oyster reef and any oysters on board the vessel shall be confiscated and disposed of by the department.The vessel shall not be permitted to harvest from any public or private reefs until the vessel is properly equipped as determined by an inspection by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-15-49.
Pass Christian Harbor oyster check station named the Colonel George J. Wright, Sr., building.

The Mississippi Department of Marine Resources’ oyster check station located at the Pass Christian Harbor, Pass Christian, Mississippi, shall be named the Colonel George J. Wright, Sr., building. The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque to be placed in a prominent place within the Colonel George J. Wright, Sr., building, which states the background, accomplishments and public health service to the state and nation of Colonel George J. Wright, Sr.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2013).

§§ 49-15-51 through 49-15-59.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 572, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1974).

§49-15-51. [Codes, 1942, § 6048-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 4]

§49-15-53. [Codes, 1942, § 6048-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 5]

§49-15-55. [Codes, 1942, § 6048-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 6]

§49-15-57. [Codes, 1942, § 6048-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 7]

§49-15-59. [Codes, 1942, § 6048-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 8]

§ 49-15-61.
Marine museum.

The governing body of any municipality or county on the Mississippi Sound having located therein a United States Department of Interior and wild life service facility are hereby authorized either severally or jointly to contribute to the cost of the construction and erection of a marine museum for the purpose of displaying aquatic products available in the Mississippi Sound and in the Gulf of Mexico. However, the United States Department of Interior shall contribute at least fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the construction and erection of such marine museum.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-19; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).

§ 49-15-63.
Penalties.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any ordinance duly adopted by the commission, unless otherwise specifically provided for herein, shall, on conviction, be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), for the first offense, unless the first offense is committed during a closed season, in which case the fine shall be not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00); and not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), for the second offense when such offense is committed within a period of three (3) years from the first offense; and not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00), or imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding thirty (30) days for any third or subsequent offense when such offense is committed within a period of three (3) years from the first offense.

In addition, upon conviction of such third or subsequent offense, it shall be the duty of the court to revoke the license of the convicted party and of the boat or vessel used in such offense, and no further license shall be issued to such person and for said boat to engage in catching or taking of any seafoods from the waters of the State of Mississippi for a period of one (1) year following such conviction. Forfeiture of any equipment or nets used in a second or subsequent offense may be instituted pursuant to Sections 49-15-201 through 49-15-207. If the person in possession of or using the nets in the violation is not the owner or licensee of the nets, the department shall notify the owner or licensee of the nets. The nets shall be subject to forfeiture unless the nets were stolen and prosecution for the theft is initiated. Equipment as used in this section shall not mean boats or vessels.

Any person convicted and sentenced under this section for a second or subsequent offense shall not be considered for reduction of sentence.

Except as provided under subsection (5) of Section 49-15-45, any fines collected under this section shall be paid into the Seafood Fund.

In addition to any other penalties, the commission may suspend the license of any person convicted of a violation of this chapter and may suspend the license of any vessel used in the violation for a period not to exceed five (5) days for the first offense. For a second offense, the commission may suspend the license of such person and vessel for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days.

Upon conviction of five (5) seafood violations within a five-year period, the commission may revoke the license of the convicted party and the boat or vessel used in the offenses, and may prohibit indefinitely the issuance of a license to the person and boat or vessel to engage in catching or taking of any seafood from the waters of the State of Mississippi. The commission shall exercise this authority in accordance with the administrative procedures in Section 49-15-401 et seq.

For any violation of this chapter, the individual registered as the captain shall be subject to the penalties provided in this chapter, if that individual is aboard the vessel. If that individual is not aboard the vessel, the individual designated as the alternate captain under Section 49-15-46 or substitute captain under Section 49-15-64.5 shall be subject to the penalties provided in this chapter. If no individual is designated under Section 49-15-46 or Section 49-15-64.5, the person, firm or corporation owning the vessel shall be subject to the penalties provided for boat captains.

All citations issued to boat operators for not possessing the boat’s registration card shall be dismissed, along with all related court costs, upon the presentment of the boat’s proper registration card to the court or magistrate holding the trial or hearing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-13; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 13; Laws, 1980, ch. 365; Laws, 1988, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 532, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 521, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 22; Laws, 1997, ch. 601, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 519, § 7; Laws, 2003, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 333, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 306, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 49-15-64.
Shrimping during closed season prohibited; penalties; promulgation of rules and regulations.

Any operator, firm or corporation engaged in commercial shrimping during the closed season shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).

Upon an arrest for a violation of this section, catch and nets may be confiscated. Any catch may be sold by the law enforcement agency making the arrest at the average wholesale price being paid for shrimp. The monies derived from the sale shall be held in escrow pending disposition of the charge. If a conviction is obtained, the monies held in escrow shall be forfeited. The monies so forfeited shall be paid to the department, to be paid into the seafood fund. If the operator, firm or corporation is acquitted of the charge or if the charge is dismissed, then the monies obtained from the sale shall be paid to the proper operator, firm or corporation. Forfeiture of confiscated nets and paraphernalia shall be instituted under Sections 49-7-251 through 49-7-257. If the person in possession of or using the nets in the violation is not the owner or licensee of the nets, the department shall notify the owner or licensee of the nets. The nets shall be subject to forfeiture unless the nets were stolen and prosecution for the theft is initiated.

The commission may issue special permits for the purpose of catching shrimp prior to the official opening of shrimp season, to those nonprofit organizations that are tax exempt under Section 501(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and which have on file with the State Tax Commission a tax exemption letter issued by the United States Internal Revenue Service. However, until January 1, 1992, the requirement that a nonprofit organization have on file with the State Tax Commission a tax exemption letter issued by the United States Internal Revenue Service shall be considered as having been met if the organization has actually made application for such exemption and has on file with the State Tax Commission a copy of its application.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the taking of shrimp by the nonprofit organization and shall issue such regulations to all organizations upon request and at the issuance of the special permit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 388, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 514, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 532, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 19; Laws, 1997, ch. 601, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 522, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 49-15-64.1.
Shrimp season: waters closed to shrimping.

The shrimp season shall open on the first Wednesday of June. The shrimp season shall be closed from January 1 until it is opened the first Wednesday of June, except south of the Intracoastal Waterway. The shrimp season shall be closed south of the Intracoastal Waterway and west of the Gulfport Ship Channel from May 1 until it is opened the first Wednesday of June, except as may be provided in subsection (2) of this section. For the purposes of this section only, that portion of the Intracoastal Waterway that extends from a point south of Long Beach to a point south of Point Clear is described as follows:

Begin at green buoy or beacon number 1 which is located approximately three (3) miles north of West Point on Cat Island, thence extending southwesterly to buoy or beacon number 4P, thence southwesterly to Pass Marianne Light, thence southwesterly to buoy or beacon number 15P at the northernmost point of Merrill Coquille, thence southwesterly to buoy or beacon number 17P, thence southwesterly to buoy or beacon number 22, thence westerly to Lighthouse Point and continuing westward following the meandering of the shoreline to the boundary line of the state.

The commission, by majority vote, may open the season at an earlier or later date in designated areas only after sampling areas within its jurisdiction where shrimp may be caught for the purpose of determining the count of shrimp per pound.The commission may also, by majority vote, close certain designated areas where the shrimp count is found, by sampling, to be in excess of sixty-eight (68) per pound.If a natural or man-made disaster has the potential of adversely affecting the shrimp fishery, the commission, by majority vote, may open legal shrimping areas.

The following waters are protective and staging areas for young shrimp, and are permanently closed to commercial and recreational shrimping activities:

All waters north of a line beginning at a point one-half mile due South of the shoreline at the Mississippi-Alabama state boundary; thence running westerly following the meanderings of the shoreline one-half mile therefrom to Light “5” in the Bayou Casotte Channel; thence running northerly to Light “7” in the Bayou Casotte Channel; thence running westerly following the meanderings of the shoreline one-half mile therefrom to the intersection with the Pascagoula Channel; thence running northwesterly to Beacon “50” in the Pascagoula Channel; thence running southwesterly to Beacon “49” in the Pascagoula Channel; thence running in the most direct line to the northeast point of Singing River Island; thence running westerly along the north shoreline to the northwest point of Singing River Island; thence running northwesterly to a point one-half mile due south of the mouth of Graveline Bayou; thence running westerly following the meanderings of the shoreline one-half mile therefrom to Beacon “18” in the Biloxi Bay Channel; thence running northwesterly to Beacon “22” in the Biloxi Bay Channel; thence running northwesterly to Beacon “26” in the Biloxi Bay Channel; thence running westerly to Beacon “34”, exclusive of the Biloxi Channel itself; thence running westerly to Beacon “30” in the Biloxi Channel, exclusive of the Biloxi Channel itself; and thence running due South to a point on the north shore of Deer Island; thence running westerly following the north shore of Deer Island to the westernmost tip; thence running westerly in the most direct line to Biloxi Beacon “8”; thence running westerly following the meanderings of the shoreline at a distance of one-half mile therefrom to a point on the centerline of the CSX Railroad Bridge over St. Louis Bay; thence running westerly along the centerline of said bridge to a point one-half mile south of the western abutment; thence running southwesterly following the meanderings of the shoreline, at a distance of one-half mile therefrom, to a point one-half mile due East of the mouth of Bayou Caddy; thence running due West to the mouth of Bayou Caddy; thence running southwesterly following the meanderings of the shoreline to the southernmost point of the Mississippi shoreline on the east bank of the mouth of the Pearl River thence following the meanderings of the east bank of the Pearl River to a point where the east bank of the Pearl River intersects the centerline of the Highway 90 bridge; thence westerly along the centerline of the Highway 90 bridge to a point that intersects the Mississippi-Louisiana state boundary.

The redesignation of beacon numbers by the United States Coast Guard shall not alter the description of the boundary described in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 9; Laws, 2003, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2017).

§ 49-15-64.2.
Shrimping permitted with cast net.

Any person shall be allowed to take shrimp in the bays located within and surrounding the cities of Bay St. Louis, Biloxi, Gautier, Ocean Springs and Pascagoula with a cast net, but shall not take more than fifty (50) pounds of shrimp per person per day for personal consumption. The cast net shall not exceed twelve (12) feet in length.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 10; Laws, 2011, ch. 450, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 49-15-64.3.
Shrimping during closed season prohibited; penalties; promulgation of rules and regulations.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to take, catch or have in their possession within territorial waters of the State of Mississippi shrimp of a size weighing in the raw state less than one (1) pound to each sixty-eight (68) shrimp, except as provided under Section 49-15-64.1, except when a valid permit or affidavit of another state identifies the catch as having been taken in non-Mississippi waters, or except in case of live bait shrimp.

It is unlawful to take, catch or have in possession live bait shrimp of a size weighing in the raw state less than one (1) pound to each one hundred (100) shrimp. This provision may be changed by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the commission. The commission may adopt rules, regulations, guidelines and other operation criteria in conjunction with licensing live bait dealers and live bait catcher boats as it deems appropriate to ensure that only bona fide operations will be licensed.

If a live bait dealer or live bait catcher boat is convicted of a violation of this chapter or a duly adopted ordinance of the commission, the commission may, in addition to punishment duly adjudicated, revoke the license of the vessel or dealer to whom it is issued for a period not exceeding two (2) weeks following conviction of the first offense, not exceeding six (6) months following conviction of the second offense, and up to one (1) year following conviction of the third and subsequent offenses, if the subsequent offenses are committed within three (3) years of the first offense. Upon the revocation of the license, the commission may require the posting of a cash performance bond not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) before the reissuance of that revoked license. The commission may require the forfeiture of that bond upon the subsequent conviction of any violation of this chapter or a duly adopted ordinance of the commission. If a person who posts bond under this section desires to no longer engage in the live bait business, that person shall certify that fact to the commission who shall return the bond. If that person desires to again engage in the live bait business, a cash performance bond may be required before the issuance of a license.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 11; Laws, 2002, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 327, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 13, 2012.).

§ 49-15-64.4.
Live bait catcher boat and live bait dealer privilege taxes.

Each live bait catcher boat engaged in taking live bait shrimp shall pay an annual privilege tax of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each boat engaged in those operations. The operations shall not exceed two (2) boats per license.

Each “live bait dealer” engaging in selling or otherwise dispensing live bait to sport fishermen shall pay an annual privilege tax of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) and must make written application to the commission providing the name of the applicant’s “live bait catcher boat,” the name of the captain of that “live bait catcher boat,” the dealer’s Mississippi state sales tax number and a sworn statement that dead shrimp will not be sold in containers having a volume in excess of sixteen (16) ounces. Licensed live bait catcher boats and licensed live bait dealers shall not operate as commercial shrimpers or commercial shrimp dealers or otherwise engage in commercial shrimping operations. Live bait dealers shall only sell or otherwise dispose of bait shrimp when alive or dead with heads attached solely as bait to recreational fishermen or other licensed live bait dealers as regulated by the commission. Only licensed commercial shrimpers may transport shrimp across the state line for the purpose of selling or delivering live bait to another state. Any person, firm or corporation found guilty of purchasing shrimp from a live bait camp or live bait catcher boat, other than for the purpose described in this section, shall be fined Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for the first offense and shall be fined Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and forfeit all seafood licenses for a second or subsequent offense. In addition, each application for a “live bait dealer” license shall contain a statement of the operating hours, at least eight (8) per twenty-four-hour period, and the location of the camp which must be accessible to the general public by public road or waters located within the three (3) coastal counties. Applications for a live bait camp may be submitted anytime. Live bait camps may be inspected within thirty (30) days after receipt of the completed application. Any “live bait dealer” desiring to engage in the catching of live shrimp in one (1) location and then transporting them to the dealer’s licensed live bait camp by truck shall first make written application to the commission providing the make and model of the truck, a Mississippi license tag number and shall be responsible for its adherence to all regulations duly adopted by the commission for the transportation of live bait shrimp. Upon receipt of the application, the commission shall verify that the applicant is in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations and after that verification the commission shall issue a permit authorizing the transportation of live shrimp.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 12; Laws, 2007, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 412, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2011.).

§ 49-15-64.5.
Boats used for catching or transporting saltwater shrimp; licensing and fees.

Each freight boat, ice boat and catching boat used in catching or transporting saltwater shrimp taken from the waters of the State of Mississippi for sale in their fresh state, or for canning, packing, freezing or drying, shall first obtain from the commission an annual privilege license and pay a license fee at the following rates:

Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for resident boats or vessels under thirty (30) feet in length in overall measurements and One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for nonresident boats or vessels under thirty (30) feet in length in overall measurements;

Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) for resident boats or vessels between thirty (30) and forty-five (45) feet in length in overall measurements and One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for nonresident boats or vessels between thirty (30) and forty-five (45) feet in length in overall measurements;

One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for resident boats or vessels greater than forty-five (45) feet in length in overall measurements and Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for nonresident boats or vessels greater than forty-five (45) feet in length in overall measurements.

Beginning September 15, 1994, no nonresident shall be issued a commercial fishing license under this chapter for the taking of saltwater shrimp using any type of net if that nonresident’s state of domicile prohibits the issuing of commercial fishing licenses to residents of this state to engage in like activity.

Each recreational vessel engaging in shrimping with a net having a corkline length of sixteen (16) feet or less shall pay an annual resident license fee of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) or an annual nonresident license fee of Thirty Dollars ($30.00).

Every freight boat, ice boat and catching boat used in catching or transporting saltwater shrimp taken from the waters of the State of Mississippi for sale in their fresh state, or for canning, packing, freezing, drying or as bait shall register the name of the captain of the vessel at the time that the vessel obtains the annual privilege license provided for in this section. The individual registered as the captain of the vessel may be substituted after notification to and the approval of the deputy director or the deputy director’s designated representative. The captain shall purchase a license entitled “captain license.” This license shall be purchased at the same time the vessel license is purchased. The fee for a captain license shall be a minimum of Ten Dollars ($10.00).

During open seasons and in open areas, saltwater shrimp may be taken only with shrimp trawls, trawls, butterfly nets, skimmer nets, push trawls, beach seines and cast nets.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 13; Laws, 1999, ch. 519, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2000.).

§ 49-15-65.
Jurisdiction of courts; appeals.

The justice courts of the respective counties or county courts shall have original jurisdiction of any prosecution or suit brought under authority of this chapter, or of any violation of any ordinance duly enacted by the commission. However, from each decision or judgment, whether from a fine or imprisonment, there shall be allowed an appeal, and such appeals and trials shall be had as now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-12; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 12; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 11; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 51; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 28, made eff from and after January 1, 1984, or, with respect to a given county, from and after such earlier date as the county appoints a justice court clerk pursuant to §9-11-27(3); Laws, 1991, ch. 522, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 49-15-67.
Appellate procedure.

Any party may file an appeal from the decision of the commission with the Chancery Court of Harrison County, Second Judicial District. The appeal shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the decision of the commission. An appeal to the chancery court shall not stay the execution of an order of the commission. Any party aggrieved by an order of the commission may petition the chancery court for an appeal with supersedeas and the court shall grant a hearing on the petition, and upon good cause shown may grant the appeal with supersedeas. If granted, the appellant shall be required to post a bond with sufficient sureties according to law in an amount to be determined by the court.

If the court finds that the order appealed from is supported by substantial evidence, is not arbitrary and capricious and does not violate constitutional rights, the court shall affirm the order of the commission.

Upon the filing of an appeal, the clerk of the chancery court shall serve notice upon the commission. The commission shall within sixty (60) days from the service of the notice, or within such additional time as the court may for cause allow, certify to the court the record in the case. The record shall include transcript of all testimony, objections, exhibits or copies thereof, pleadings, proceedings, orders, findings and opinions entered in the case. However, the parties and commission may stipulate that only a specified portion of the record shall be certified to the court as the record on appeal.

If, upon hearing the appeal, it appears to the court that any testimony has been improperly excluded by the commission or that the facts disclosed by the record are insufficient for the equitable disposition of the appeal, the court shall refer the case back to the commission to take such evidence as the court may direct and report the evidence to the court with the commission’s findings of fact and conclusions of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-15; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 15; Laws, 2009, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 49-15-69.
Exemption of certain minors, senior citizens or disabled persons from licensing requirements.

Any resident citizen of the State of Mississippi (a) who is not over sixteen (16) years of age; or (b) who is sixty-five (65) years of age or more; or (c) who has been adjudged to have a service-connected one hundred percent (100%) disability, shall not be required to purchase or possess a license or permit, except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, or to pay any fee or charge when fishing for or taking for personal, noncommercial use the following: (a) crabs, (b) shrimps, or (c) oysters.

The commission is hereby directed to promulgate and publish rules and regulations to implement the policy set forth in subsection (1) of this section. Such rules shall provide that persons exempted under subsection (1) of this section shall apply to the department for certification as to age or disability and shall be required to carry a certification card issued by the commission while engaged in taking above-mentioned marine life.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 405; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 88, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-15-71.
Commercial taking of redfish prohibited; unlawful to take below minimum size; penalties; redfish management plan.

It is unlawful for any boat or vessel carrying or using a purse seine to have on board such boat or vessel any quantity of redfish within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to catch, take or land redfish below minimum legal size as established by regulations promulgated by the commission and in accordance with the Red Drum Fishery Management Plan. The department shall develop a redfish management plan and the commission shall promulgate regulations to implement the plan after conducting a public hearing relating to the plan and regulations. Beginning on July 1, 1998, and every four (4) years thereafter, the commission shall review the plan and regulations promulgated under the plan, and upon a determination that revisions are appropriate, the commission shall amend the plan or regulations, or both, in a manner to effectuate the desired changes.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined in the amount of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each redfish possessed in violation of this section. All nets used in violating this section are hereby declared contraband and shall be subject to seizure and forfeiture. If the person in possession of or using the nets in the violation is not the owner or licensee of the nets, the department shall notify the owner or licensee of the nets. The nets shall be subject to forfeiture unless the nets were stolen and prosecution for the theft is initiated. It shall be the duty of the court to order the forfeiture of any nets used in violating the provisions of this section. The fine imposed upon a person convicted under this section shall not be suspended or reduced. The master and owner of any vessel upon which redfish is possessed in violation of this section shall be jointly and severally liable for the penalty imposed herein.

For the purposes of this section, the term “redfish” means red drum or sciaenops ocellatus.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 579, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 603, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 23; Laws, 1997, ch. 601, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 49-15-73.
Use of aircraft to assist in harvesting of redfish; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use or employ any aircraft in the airspace of this state to assist in the harvesting of redfish as defined in Section 49-15-71. Aircraft employed in any manner contrary to the provisions of this section shall not be registered, hangered, maintained, provisioned or serviced within this state, excepting in an emergency in which the lives of the pilot or crew of such aircraft are at risk. A person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished as provided in Section 49-15-63, Mississippi Code of 1972. In addition to the penalty prescribed by such section, any aircraft and any equipment utilized in the taking of redfish contrary to the provisions of this section shall be subject to confiscation under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 497, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 49-15-74.
Open season for menhaden.

The commission shall establish open season for menhaden not later than the third Monday in April and ending no sooner than the second Tuesday in October.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 14, eff from and after July 2, 1997.

§ 49-15-75.
Catch limit based on weight limitations as to certain fish.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation using a purse seine or having a purse seine aboard a boat or vessel within the territorial waters of the State of Mississippi to catch in excess of five percent (5%) by weight in any single set of the net or to possess in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight of the total catch any of the following species: spotted seatrout (Cynscion nebulosus); bluefish (Pomatomus saltatrix); Spanish mackerel (Scomberomorus maculatus); king mackerel (Scomberomorus cavalla); dolphin (Corphaena hippurus); pompano (Trachinotus carolinus); cobia (Rachycentron canadum); or jack crevalle (Caranx hippos).

A person, firm or corporation convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished as provided in Section 49-15-63, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 497, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 49-15-76.
Prohibition of sale of game fish; exceptions; punishment.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, barter or trade or to offer for sale, barter or trade any game fish enumerated in this chapter.

Cobia may be sold in this state if the cobia is purchased from a state in which it may lawfully be caught and sold. Any individual, partnership, corporation or other entity which sells cobia in this state shall maintain documentation showing the state of purchase and date of purchase of cobia for a period of sixty (60) days from the date of purchase of the cobia. The Department of Marine Resources or any other law enforcement agency with which the department has a cooperating agreement may require any seller of cobia to document the date and state of purchase.

Any person who cultivates a game fish as permitted under the Mississippi Aquaculture Act of 1988 may sell the game fish in accordance with the marine aquaculture program.

A person who violates this section shall be punished as provided in Section 49-15-63.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1997).

§ 49-15-77.
Prohibition against catching saltwater fish by use of certain nets, seines or traps in certain areas of the state; punishment.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to catch, take or carry away any saltwater fish by or with any trammel nets, purse seines, seines, fish traps or other like contrivances except permitted eel traps, in any area of the State of Mississippi within one hundred (100) feet of the mouth of any river, bayou, creek, canal, stream, tributary, lake, bay, inlet or other water source entering into areas defined as salt waters under the jurisdiction of the commission.

A person, firm or corporation convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished as provided in Section 49-15-100(2), Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 497, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 601, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 20; Laws, 1997, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.